District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.129

Repealed

Penalties — Failure to maintain registered office or registered agent.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 232, ch. 269, § 129
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 441(c), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-940.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.30.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.129.